District of Columbia statutes.
1-627.04

Travel expenses.

(a)

A District agency may, in accordance with the applicable travel rules and regulations, pay the travel expenses of an employee assigned to another government, private sector organization, or institution of higher education on either a detail or leave basis, but shall not pay the travel expenses of any employee incurred in connection with his or her work assignment at the receiving agency. If the assignment will be for a period of time exceeding 9 months, travel expenses may include expenses of transportation of immediate family, household goods, and personal effects to and from the location of the receiving agency. If the period of assignment is less than 9 months, the District agency may pay a daily allowance to the employee on assignment or detail.

(b)

A District agency may, in accordance with the applicable travel rules and regulations, pay travel expenses of a person assigned to it under this subchapter during the period of such an assignment on the same basis as if he or she were a regular employee of the District.

(c)

The costs associated with travel, relocation, and daily expenses may be shared by the participating governments, private sector organization, or institution of higher education or be borne solely by either party to the agreement.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2704, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 1101(d), 43 DCR 5
1981 Ed., § 1-628.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-357.4.